Massachusetts, session 194th, H5606.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. The mayor of the city of Somerville may appoint special police officers for 
the city as the mayor deems necessary for the safety and protection of the citizens.  
SECTION 2. Special police officers appointed under this act shall have the same power 
to make arrests and to perform other police functions as reserve and intermittent police officers 
in or upon lands or structures owned, used or occupied by Somerville Housing Authority 
residents and staff and to perform any police duties arising therefrom. Special police officers 
appointed under this act shall be subject to the applicable training requirements of such officers 
established by the municipal police training committee and the city.  
SECTION 3. Special police officers shall be appointed for a term to be determined by the 
mayor, subject to removal by the mayor with the recommendation of the chief of police. Special 

of 2 11 police officers shall be confirmed by the city council and sworn before the city clerk who shall 
keep a record of all such appointments and the term of appointment.  
SECTION 4. The Somerville police chief may, in the Chief’s sole discretion, adopt rules 
and regulations, policies, procedures, and requirements that shall be applicable to all or certain 
special police officers including, but not to be limited to, requirements regarding medical 
examinations to determine continuing capability to perform the duties of a special police officer, 
requirements for training, requirements for firearms licensing and qualifications, manner of 
performance of duties, and requirements regarding uniforms and equipment.  
SECTION 5. Special police officers appointed pursuant to this act shall not be subject to 
chapter 31 of the General Laws, section 99A of chapter 41 of the General Laws, or chapter 150E 
of the General Laws.  
SECTION 6. This act shall take effect upon its passage.